Missouri, session 2026, SB1003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 41.216, 41.220, 41.475, 42.300,
42.310, 42.312, 42.315, 105.265, 105.270, and 173.239, RSMo,
are repealed and eighteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 41.216, 41.475, 41.598, 41.599, 41.1015,
41.1016, 41.1017, 41.1018, 42.300, 42.310, 42.311, 42.312,
42.313, 42.315, 42.316, 105.265, 105.270, and 173.239, to read
as follows:
41.216. 1. Subject to appropriation and upon the
recommendation of a panel consisting of a [sergeant major]
senior enlisted leader of the Missouri National Guard, a
sergeant major of a reserve component or its equivalent, and
a representative of the Missouri [veterans] veterans'
commission [who shall establish criteria for the grants by
the promulgation of rules and regulations], the adjutant
general shall have the power to establish criteria for the
grants by the promulgation of rules and regulations, and to
make grants or provide other financial assistance or
services from the Missouri military family relief fund to
members of the Missouri National Guard, families of persons
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 1003 2
who are members of the Missouri National Guard [or], and to
Missouri residents who are members of the reserves of the
Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2005, shall be invalid and void.
41.475. 1. The governor is hereby authorized to
request volunteers of the organized militia to assist
federal law enforcement authorities within or outside the
state, or to assist federal, state or local law enforcement
authorities within this state, and order such volunteers to
duty for the purpose of providing assistance in drug
interdiction and counter-drug activities and operation and
maintenance of equipment and facilities for such purposes
pursuant to plans adopted and funding assistance received
under the provisions of 32 U.S.C. 112.
2. The governor may delegate the authority conferred
by this section to the adjutant general, but the governor
shall retain sole authority to approve any and all plans
submitted to the Secretary of Defense under 32 U.S.C. 112.
The adjutant general shall ensure that all directives and
policies of the Department of Defense and National Guard
Bureau are followed. Personnel assisting in such activities

SCS SB 1003 3
shall obey and execute the instructions of the civil
authorities charged by law with responsibility for law
enforcement.
3. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to
present, in the name of the state of Missouri, a Missouri
National Guard counterdrug program ribbon, which shall be of
suitable design, as may be determined by the adjutant
general, to individual members of the Missouri National
Guard who have participated in the counterdrug program. The
period of eligibility shall be from January 1, 1989, to a
future date to be determined by the adjutant general or the
cessation of the counterdrug program. No Missouri National
Guard counterdrug program ribbon shall be awarded to or
retained by any person whose entire service shall not have
been honorable. If a member qualifies for the Missouri
National Guard counterdrug program ribbon but dies before
making a request or before receipt, then the Missouri
National Guard counterdrug program ribbon may be requested
by and presented to the surviving primary next of kin. The
adjutant general shall adopt policies and operating
regulations concerning only its internal management of this
Missouri National Guard counterdrug program ribbon, which
need not be published in the Missouri Register or the code
of state regulations under chapter 536, but these
regulations shall be available for public inspection and
review.
41.598. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to
present, in the name of the state of Missouri, a Missouri
National Guard homeland response force program ribbon, which
shall be of suitable design, as may be determined by the
adjutant general, to individual members of the Missouri
National Guard who have participated in the homeland

SCS SB 1003 4
response force program. The period of eligibility shall be
from January 1, 2012, to a future date to be determined by
the adjutant general or the cessation of the homeland
response force program. No Missouri National Guard homeland
response force program ribbon shall be awarded to or
retained by any person whose entire service shall not have
been honorable. If a member qualifies for the Missouri
National Guard homeland response force ribbon but dies
before making a request or before receipt, then the Missouri
National Guard homeland response force program ribbon may be
requested by and presented to the surviving primary next of
kin. The adjutant general shall adopt policies and
operating regulations concerning only its internal
management of this Missouri National Guard homeland response
force program ribbon, which need not be published in the
Missouri Register or the code of state regulations under
chapter 536, but these regulations shall be available for
public inspection and review.
41.599. The adjutant general is hereby authorized to
present, in the name of the state of Missouri, a Missouri
National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent
ribbon, which shall be of suitable design, as may be
determined by the adjutant general, to individual members of
the Missouri National Guard who have participated in an
engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent course. The
period of eligibility shall be from January 1, 2012, to a
future date to be determined by the adjutant general or the
cessation of the engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent
course. No Missouri National Guard engineer explosive
ordnance clearance agent ribbon shall be awarded to or
retained by any person whose entire service shall not have
been honorable. If a member qualifies for the Missouri

SCS SB 1003 5
National Guard engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent
ribbon but dies before making a request or before receipt,
then the Missouri National Guard engineer explosive ordnance
clearance agent ribbon may be requested by and presented to
the surviving primary next of kin. The adjutant general
shall adopt policies and operating regulations concerning
only its internal management of this Missouri National Guard
engineer explosive ordnance clearance agent ribbon, which
need not be published in the Missouri Register or the code
of state regulations under chapter 536, but these
regulations shall be available for public inspection and
review.
41.1015. Sections 41.1015 to 41.1018 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Cybersecurity Mission Act".
41.1016. As used in sections 41.1015 to 41.1018, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Critical infrastructure facility", the same
meaning as such term is defined in section 569.086;
(2) "Cyber-attack prevention", proactive measures and
strategies implemented to identify, reduce, and eliminate
vulnerabilities in information systems, including, but not
limited to, risk assessments, employee training, system
updates, firewalls, encryption, and access controls, with
the goal of preventing unauthorized access or malicious
activities;
(3) "Cyber-attack response", actions taken during and
immediately following a cybersecurity incident or cyber
attack to contain, mitigate, and remediate the effects of
the incident, including, but not limited to, incident
reporting, forensic analysis, system isolation, and
communication with affected parties;

SCS SB 1003 6
(4) "Cyber-attack support", assistance provided to
parties or entities affected by a cybersecurity incident,
including, but not limited to, technical aid, recovery of
data and systems, mitigation efforts, and guidance on
improving future cybersecurity measures;
(5) "Cybersecurity", the practice of protecting
networks, systems, devices, data, and information from
unauthorized access, disruption, destruction, or theft,
through the implementation of policies, procedures,
technologies, and practices designed to ensure the
confidentiality, integrity, reliability, and availability of
the networks, systems, devices, data, and information;
(6) "Governing body", the same meaning as such term is
defined in section 67.750;
(7) "Law enforcement agency", the same meaning as such
term is defined in section 590.1040;
(8) "Political subdivision", the same meaning as such
term is defined in section 67.750;
(9) "Public college and university", the same meaning
as the term "public colleges and universities" is defined in
section 173.355;
(10) "Utility company", the same meaning as such term
is defined in section 393.550.
41.1017. 1. Upon the request of the director of the
department of public safety or his or her designee, the
Missouri National Guard may enter into agreements with a
party or parties, pertaining to rendering aid related to
cybersecurity, cyber-attack prevention, cyber-attack
response, and cyber-attack support activities for this state
or for a political subdivision, governing body, public
college and university, law enforcement agency, utility
company, and critical infrastructure facility of this state,

SCS SB 1003 7
but under no circumstances shall the Missouri National Guard
violate the civil liberties or constitutional rights of any
United States citizen or access, modify, scan, control, or
view content contained within any civilian-owned system,
device, telephone, computer, communications, or network
without the consent of the owner explicitly and
conspicuously given to the Missouri National Guard.
2. The adjutant general may activate members of the
Missouri National Guard, on state orders, to carry out the
rendering of aid covered under subsection 1 of this section.
3. The adjutant general may charge and may receive
reimbursement for expenses incurred by the Missouri National
Guard, related to rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of
this section. The adjutant general shall determine when
activating members of the Missouri National Guard, on state
orders, whether expenses related to rendering aid pursuant
to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected through
reimbursement or charge prior to the time the services are
rendered. If expenses are collected by charge prior to the
time the services are rendered and the amount of such
expense cannot be readily determined, then the adjutant
general shall receive, from the requesting party, a deposit
based upon the likely amount of such expense, and the
balance of such expense shall be payable immediately upon
ascertainment of the proper amount of said expense.
4. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"Missouri National Guard Cybersecurity Revolving Fund",
which shall consist of:
(1) Monies appropriated by the general assembly;
(2) Monies received as a charge for expenses incurred
by the Missouri National Guard, related to rendering aid
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section; and

SCS SB 1003 8
(3) Monies received as reimbursement for expenses
incurred by the Missouri National Guard, related to
rendering aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this section.
This fund shall be administered by the adjutant general.
All funds received under this section shall be transmitted
to the director of revenue for deposit in the fund and
shall, upon appropriation by the general assembly, be used
by the adjutant general for the sole purpose of rendering
aid pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. The state
treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund and shall issue
warrants from the fund at the request of the adjutant
general after approval for payment is made by the
commissioner of administration. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the
Missouri National Guard cybersecurity revolving fund at the
end of any biennium shall not be transferred to the credit
of the general revenue fund.
41.1018. The adjutant general shall administer the
provisions of sections 41.1015 to 41.1018, and may adopt all
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions
of sections 41.1015 to 41.1018. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 41.1015 to
41.1018 shall become effective only if it complies with and
is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 41.1015 to 41.1018
and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and
annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then

SCS SB 1003 9
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
42.300. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust
Fund" which shall consist of money collected under section
313.835. The state treasurer shall administer the veterans
commission capital improvement trust fund, and the moneys in
such fund shall be used solely, upon appropriation, by the
Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission for:
(1) The construction, maintenance or renovation or
equipment needs of veterans' homes in this state;
(2) The construction, maintenance, renovation,
equipment needs and operation of veterans' cemeteries in
this state;
(3) Fund transfers to Missouri veterans' homes fund
established under the provisions of section 42.121, as
necessary to maintain solvency of the fund;
(4) Fund transfers to any municipality with a
population greater than four hundred thousand and located in
part of a county with a population greater than six hundred
thousand in this state which has established a fund for the
sole purpose of the restoration, renovation and maintenance
of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I.
Appropriations from the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund to such memorial fund shall be
provided only as a one-time match for other funds devoted to
the project and shall not exceed five million dollars.
Additional appropriations not to exceed ten million dollars
total may be made from the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund as a match to other funds for the new
construction or renovation of other facilities dedicated as
veterans' memorials in the state. All appropriations for

SCS SB 1003 10
renovation, new construction, reconstruction, and
maintenance of veterans' memorials shall be made only for
applications received by the Missouri [veterans] veterans'
commission prior to July 1, 2004;
(5) The issuance of matching fund grants for veterans'
service officer programs to any federally chartered
veterans' organization or municipal government agency that
is certified by the Veterans Administration to process
veteran claims within the Veterans Administration System;
provided that such veterans' organization has maintained a
veterans' service officer presence within the state of
Missouri for the three-year period immediately preceding the
issuance of any such grant. A total of one million five
hundred thousand dollars in grants shall be made available
annually for service officers and joint training and
outreach between veterans' service organizations and the
Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission with grants being
issued in July of each year. Application for the matching
grants shall be made through and approved by the Missouri
[veterans] veterans' commission based on the requirements
established by the commission;
(6) For payment of Missouri National Guard and
Missouri [veterans] veterans' commission expenses associated
with providing medals, medallions, and certificates in
recognition of service in the Armed Forces of the United
States [during World War II, the Korean Conflict, and the
Vietnam War under sections 42.170 to 42.226] for any
conflict, war, operation, or similar incident identified
under chapter 42. Any funds remaining from the medals,
medallions, and certificates shall not be transferred to any
other fund and shall only be utilized for the awarding of

SCS SB 1003 11
future medals, medallions, and certificates in recognition
of service in the Armed Forces;
(7) Fund transfers totaling ten million dollars to any
municipality with a population greater than three hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants and located in part in a county
with a population greater than six hundred thousand
inhabitants and with a charter form of government, for the
sole purpose of the construction, restoration, renovation
and maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to
World War I; and
(8) The administration of the Missouri [veterans]
veterans' commission.
2. Any interest which accrues to the fund shall remain
in the fund and shall be used in the same manner as moneys
which are transferred to the fund under this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, moneys in the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not
be transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
3. Upon request by the [veterans] Missouri veterans'
commission, the general assembly may appropriate moneys from
the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund to
the Missouri National Guard trust fund to support the
activities described in section 41.958.
42.310. 1. There is hereby created within the state
adjutant general's office the "Operation Iraqi Freedom and
Operation New Dawn Medallion Program". Every veteran who
honorably served on active duty in the United States
military service at any time beginning March 19, 2003, and
ending December 15, 2011, shall be entitled to receive an
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion,

SCS SB 1003 12
medal, and certificate of appreciation under this section,
provided that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or
was a legal resident of this state at the time he or she
entered or was discharged from military service or at the
time of his or her death or such veteran served in a unit of
the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether such
veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged
from military service, is still in active service in an
honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable
status at the time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn
medallion, medal, and certificate shall be awarded
regardless of whether such veteran served within the United
States or in a foreign country. The medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such
veteran was under eighteen years of age at the time of
enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation
Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and
certificate under this section:
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation Iraqi
Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and
certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased
veteran who would be entitled to an Operation Iraqi Freedom
and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate
under subsection 1 of this section but who died prior to
having made application for such medallion, medal, and
certificate.

SCS SB 1003 13
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for
the Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn
medallion, medal, and certificate under this section or if
any veteran dies after applying for an Operation Iraqi
Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and
certificate under this section and such veteran would have
been entitled to the Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation
New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate, the adjutant
general shall give the Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation
New Dawn medallion, medal, and certificate to the spouse or
eldest living survivor of the deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the
form of Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn
medallion, medal, and certificate and forward the approved
designs to the adjutant general for distribution pursuant to
sections 42.310 to 42.311. It is the intent of the general
assembly to create statewide involvement in the design of
these symbols in recognition of this historic endeavor.
Therefore, in designing the forms, the Missouri veterans'
commission may solicit potential designs from elementary and
secondary schools, veterans' groups, civic organizations, or
any other interested parties, and may select the best design
from among such solicited designs, or may select another
design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran"
means any person defined as a veteran by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.311. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections
42.310 to 42.311, the adjutant general shall administer the
provisions of sections 42.310 to 42.311, and may adopt all
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions
of sections 42.310 to 42.311. Any rule or portion of a

SCS SB 1003 14
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 42.310 to
42.311 shall become effective only if it complies with and
is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 42.310 to 42.311 and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review,
to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a
rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted
after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as
expeditiously as possible the persons who are entitled to an
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion,
medal, and certificate under sections 42.310 to 42.311 and
distribute the medallions, medals, and certificates as
provided in sections 42.310 to 42.311. Applications for the
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion,
medal, and certificate shall be filed with the office of the
adjutant general at any time after August 28, 2026, on forms
prescribed and furnished by the office of the adjutant
general. The adjutant general shall approve all
applications that are in order, and shall cause an Operation
Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn medallion, medal, and
certificate to be prepared for each approved veteran in the
form created by the Missouri veterans' commission under
section 42.310. The medallions, medals, and certificates
shall be awarded until the supply of medallions, medals, and
certificates is exhausted. The adjutant general shall
notify the general assembly when such supply totals less
than one hundred.

SCS SB 1003 15
42.312. 1. There is hereby created within the state
adjutant general's office the "Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge
Program". Every veteran who honorably served on active duty
in the United States military service at any time beginning
October 7, 2001, and ending August 30, 2021, shall be
entitled to receive an Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation
Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge medallion,
medal, and certificate of appreciation under this section,
provided that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or
was a legal resident of this state at the time he or she
entered or was discharged from military service or at the
time of his or her death, or such veteran served in a unit
of the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether such
veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged
from military service, is still in active service in an
honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable
status at the time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's
Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such
veteran served within the United States or in a foreign
country. The medallion, medal, and certificate shall be
awarded regardless of whether such veteran was under
eighteen years of age at the time of enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate under this section:

SCS SB 1003 16
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased
veteran who would be entitled to an Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies
Refuge Program medallion, medal, and certificate under
subsection 1 of this section but who died prior to having
made application for such medallion, medal, and certificate.
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for
the Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's
Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion,
medal, and certificate under this section or if any veteran
dies after applying for an Operation Enduring Freedom,
Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge
Program medallion, medal, and certificate under this section
and such veteran would have been entitled to the Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate, the adjutant general shall give the Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate to the spouse or eldest living survivor of the
deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the
form of the Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's
Sentinel, and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion,
medal, and certificate and forward the approved designs to
the adjutant general for distribution pursuant to sections
42.312 to 42.313. It is the intent of the general assembly
to create statewide involvement in the design of these

SCS SB 1003 17
symbols in recognition of this historic endeavor.
Therefore, in designing the forms, the Missouri veterans'
commission may solicit potential designs from elementary and
secondary schools, veterans' groups, civic organizations, or
any other interested parties, and may select the best design
from among such solicited designs, or may select another
design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran"
means any person defined as a veteran by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.313. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections
42.312 to 42.313, the adjutant general shall administer the
provisions of sections 42.312 to 42.313, and may adopt all
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions
of sections 42.312 to 42.313. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 42.312 to
42.313 shall become effective only if it complies with and
is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 42.312 to 42.313 and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review,
to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a
rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted
after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as
expeditiously as possible the persons who are entitled to an
Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel,
and Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate under sections 42.312 to 42.313 and distribute
the medallions, medals, and certificates as provided in

SCS SB 1003 18
sections 42.312 to 42.313. Applications for the Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate shall be filed with the office of the adjutant
general at any time after August 28, 2026, on forms
prescribed and furnished by the office of the adjutant
general. The adjutant general shall approve all
applications that are in order, and shall cause an Operation
Enduring Freedom, Operation Freedom's Sentinel, and
Operation Allies Refuge Program medallion, medal, and
certificate to be prepared for each approved veteran in the
form created by the Missouri veterans' commission under
section 42.312. The medallions, medals, and certificates
shall be awarded until the supply of medallions, medals, and
certificates is exhausted. The adjutant general shall
notify the general assembly when such supply totals less
than one hundred.
42.315. 1. There is hereby created within the state
adjutant general's office the "Operation Desert Shield and
Operation Desert Storm Medallion Program". Every veteran
who honorably served on active duty in the United States
military service at any time beginning August 7, 1990, and
ending June 7, 1991, shall be entitled to receive an
Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm
medallion, medal, and certificate of appreciation under this
section, provided that:
(1) Such veteran is a legal resident of this state or
was a legal resident of this state at the time he or she
entered or was discharged from military service or at the
time of his or her death or such veteran served in a unit of
the Missouri National Guard regardless of whether such
veteran is or ever was a legal resident of this state; and

SCS SB 1003 19
(2) Such veteran was honorably separated or discharged
from military service, is still in active service in an
honorable status, or was in active service in an honorable
status at the time of his or her death.
2. The Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert
Storm medallion, medal, and certificate shall be awarded
regardless of whether such veteran served within the United
States or in a foreign country. The medallion, medal, and
the certificate shall be awarded regardless of whether such
veteran was under eighteen years of age at the time of
enlistment.
3. The following persons may apply for an Operation
Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal,
and certificate under this section:
(1) Any veteran who is entitled to an Operation Desert
Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and
certificate under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Any spouse or eldest living survivor of a deceased
veteran who would be entitled to an Operation Desert Shield
and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate
under subsection 1 of this section but who died prior to
having made application for such medallion, medal, and
certificate.
4. If any spouse or eldest living survivor applies for
the Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm
medallion, medal, and certificate under this section or if
any veteran dies after applying for an Operation Desert
Shield and Operation Desert Storm medallion, medal, and
certificate under this section and such veteran would have
been entitled to the Operation Desert Shield and Operation
Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate, the adjutant
general shall give the Operation Desert Shield and Operation

SCS SB 1003 20
Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate to the spouse
or eldest living survivor of the deceased veteran.
5. The Missouri veterans' commission shall design the
form of the Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert
Storm medallion, medal, and certificate and forward the
approved designs to the adjutant general for distribution
pursuant to sections 42.315 to 42.316. It is the intent of
the general assembly to create statewide involvement in the
design of these symbols in recognition of this historic
endeavor. Therefore, in designing the forms, the Missouri
veterans' commission may solicit potential designs from
elementary and secondary schools, veterans' groups, civic
organizations, or any other interested parties, and may
select the best design from among such solicited designs, or
may select another design.
6. For purposes of this section, the term "veteran"
means any person defined as a veteran by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency.
42.316. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections
42.315 to 42.316, the adjutant general shall administer the
provisions of sections 42.315 to 42.316, and may adopt all
rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions
of sections 42.315 to 42.316. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in sections 42.315 to
42.316 shall become effective only if it complies with and
is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. Sections 42.315 to 42.316 and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review,
to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a
rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant

SCS SB 1003 21
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted
after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The adjutant general shall determine as
expeditiously as possible the persons who are entitled to an
Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm
medallion, medal, and certificate under sections 42.315 to
42.316 and distribute the medallions, medals, and
certificates as provided in sections 42.315 to 42.316.
Applications for the Operation Desert Shield and Operation
Desert Storm medallion, medal, and certificate shall be
filed with the office of the adjutant general at any time
after August 28, 2026, on forms prescribed and furnished by
the office of the adjutant general. The adjutant general
shall approve all applications that are in order, and shall
cause an Operation Desert Shield and Operation Desert Storm
medallion, medal, and certificate to be prepared for each
approved veteran in the form created by the Missouri
veterans' commission under section 42.315. The medallions,
medals, and certificates shall be awarded until the supply
of medallions, medals, and certificates is exhausted. The
adjutant general shall notify the general assembly when such
supply totals less than one hundred.
105.265. 1. All officers and employees of this state,
or of any department or agency thereof, all members of state
retirement systems, and all other public employees of this
state who are entitled to life insurance benefits as a state
employee or a member of a state retirement system, and who
are or become members of the United States Armed Forces or
the National Guard and who are called to military service
under competent orders from the appropriate military
authority in time of active armed warfare shall be entitled
to such life insurance benefits for the entire duration of

SCS SB 1003 22
such military deployment, including time periods in excess
of twelve months, subject to the terms and conditions of any
life insurance policy that may be in place to provide such
coverage. Such persons shall be required to pay the cost of
such coverage.
2. (1) The adjutant general shall be the official
sponsor of the state-sponsored life insurance program. The
adjutant general shall:
(a) Allow, facilitate, and coordinate all efforts to
make the state-sponsored life insurance program available to
all members of the Missouri National Guard;
(b) Provide an opportunity for members of the Missouri
National Guard to purchase products of the state-sponsored
life insurance program;
(c) Allow, facilitate, and coordinate requested
allotments with the appropriate United States Property and
Fiscal Office for purposes of the state-sponsored life
insurance program;
(d) Allow representatives of the state-sponsored life
insurance program to provide members of the Missouri
National Guard with briefings during annual training and
inactive duty training periods to educate members on the
state-sponsored life insurance program and its benefits; and
(e) Allow members of the Missouri National Guard to
designate or change beneficiaries under the state-sponsored
life insurance program.
(2) The Missouri National Guard Association shall
select the insurer used to provide the state-sponsored life
insurance program.
(3) As used in this subsection, the term "state-
sponsored life insurance program" means the life insurance
program exclusively offered to all members of the Missouri

SCS SB 1003 23
National Guard through the Missouri National Guard
Association pursuant to the federal Veterans' Insurance Act
of 1974, Pub. L. 93-289.
105.270. 1. All officers and employees of this state,
or of any department or agency thereof, or of any county,
municipality, school district, or other political
subdivision, and all other public employees of this state
who are or may become members of the National Guard or of
any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United
States, shall be entitled to leave of absence from their
respective duties, without loss of time, pay, regular leave,
impairment of efficiency rating, or of any other rights or
benefits, to which otherwise entitled, for all periods of
military services during which they are engaged in the
performance of duty or training in the service of this state
at the call of the governor and as ordered by the adjutant
general without regard to length of time, and for all
periods of military services during which they are engaged
in the performance of duty in the service of the United
States under competent orders for a period not to exceed a
total of one hundred [twenty] sixty hours in any federal
fiscal year.
2. Before any payment of salary is made covering the
period of the leave the officer or the employee shall file
with the appointing authority or supervising agency an
official order from the appropriate military authority as
evidence of such duty for which military leave pay is
granted which order shall contain the certification of the
officer or employee's commanding officer of performance of
duty in accordance with the terms of such order.
3. No member of the organized militia shall be
discharged from employment by any of the aforementioned

SCS SB 1003 24
agencies because of being a member of the organized militia,
nor shall he be hindered or prevented from performing any
militia service he may be called upon to perform by proper
authority nor otherwise be discriminated against or
dissuaded from enlisting or continuing his service in the
militia by threat or injury to him in respect to his
employment. Any officer or agent of the aforementioned
agencies violating any of the provisions of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
administrative rule or law to the contrary, any person
entitled to military leave pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section shall only be charged military
leave for any hours which that person would otherwise have
been required to work had it not been for such military
leave. The minimum charge for military leave shall be one
hour and additional charges for military leave shall be in
multiples of the minimum charge.
173.239. 1. Any member of the Missouri National Guard
who possesses the qualifications set forth in this section
may, while he or she is a member of the Missouri National
Guard, be awarded educational assistance in the form of:
(1) A tuition and fee waiver for undergraduate courses
at a postsecondary institution of higher education located
in this state that directly receives funds appropriated by
the general assembly. This tuition and fee waiver shall not
be implemented prior to the 2025-26 academic year. The
tuition and fee waiver shall be only for tuition and fees
that remain after the application of all payments from a
tuition assistance program of the National Guard, Army, or
Air Force; additional federal military tuition assistance;
[GI Bill educational entitlements;] awarded external

SCS SB 1003 25
scholarships; and federal financial grants, including the
Pell grant, that are available to the member in the current
semester. For purposes of this section, the term "fee" or
"fees" mean any mandatory fees charged by an institution to
all full-time students as a condition of enrollment; or
(2) A grant to an eligible institution of his or her
choice. For purposes of this subdivision, the term
"eligible institution" shall mean:
(a) An approved public institution or an approved
private institution, as those terms are defined in section
173.1102; or
(b) Any institution of postsecondary education that is
required by law to be, and currently is, certified to
operate by the coordinating board for higher education; that
is institutionally accredited by an accrediting commission
recognized by the United States Department of Education;
that has operated continuously in this state for five or
more years; that has no more than fifty percent of its
students in correspondence programs; and that offers a one-
year or two-year certificate, associate or baccalaureate
degree programs, or graduate or professional degree programs.
2. (1) Educational assistance provided under this
section shall not exceed the lesser of the following:
(a) The actual tuition, as defined in section 173.260,
charged at an approved institution where the member is
enrolled or accepted for enrollment; or
(b) The product of the number of credit hours taken
multiplied by the average tuition cost per credit hour
charged to a Missouri resident at the University of Missouri
for attendance, with such average cost determined by the
Missouri National Guard.

SCS SB 1003 26
(2) The grants provided under this section may be
prorated subject to appropriations in an amount no less than
fifty percent of the limits set forth in this subsection.
3. (1) For either type of educational assistance
described in this section, a member of the Missouri National
Guard may apply to the appropriate office of the Missouri
National Guard before each semester. The member shall:
(a) Provide a certificate of satisfactory service of
his or her Missouri National Guard duties from his or her
commanding officer;
(b) Possess all other necessary entrance requirements
of the school of his or her choice;
(c) Provide proof of maintaining a cumulative grade
point average (GPA) of at least two point five on a four-
point scale, or the equivalent on another scale approved by
the program administrator, while attending the approved
public or private institution;
(d) Have not yet earned a bachelor's degree; and
(e) Have completed and submitted a FAFSA for the
academic term for which educational assistance is requested.
(2) For the tuition and fee waiver, the waiver shall
be awarded if the member applies and is otherwise eligible
pursuant to this section, but the waiver shall be awarded
only after the Missouri National Guard has distributed any
moneys available for the member through the state tuition
assistance program.
4. If the grade point average of a member who is
receiving educational assistance pursuant to this section
falls below two point five on a four-point scale, or the
equivalent on another scale, such member shall retain the
educational assistance and shall be placed on probation
under the educational assistance program. Failure to

SCS SB 1003 27
achieve a current grade point average of at least two point
five on a four-point scale or the equivalent on another
scale for future semesters or equivalent academic terms
shall result in termination of the educational assistance
effective as of the next academic term. The member shall be
removed from probation status upon achieving a cumulative
grade point average of two point five on a four-point scale
or the equivalent on another scale.
5. For the tuition and fee waiver, an applicant shall
cease to be eligible if the total number of credit hours
completed by the applicant exceeds one hundred twenty.
Credit hours earned with the educational assistance
described in this section and credit hours earned without
the educational assistance described in this section shall
be counted to determine the total number of credit hours
completed by an applicant for purposes of this subsection.
6. The tuition and fee waiver shall not be available
in any fiscal year in which the percent of total program
costs covered by the state appropriation for the educational
assistance provided pursuant to this section has decreased
compared to the previous fiscal year.
7. If a recipient of either type of educational
100 assistance pursuant to this section ceases to maintain their
101 active military affiliation while enrolled in an academic
102 semester or term for any reason except death, disability, or
103 medical disqualification the educational assistance shall be
104 terminated and the recipient shall repay any amounts awarded
105 or waived for the academic semester or term.
106 8. The educational assistance program established
107 pursuant to this section shall be administered by the office
108 of the adjutant general of the Missouri National Guard. The
109 Missouri National Guard shall establish guidelines for

SCS SB 1003 28
110 equitable administrative distribution of educational
111 assistance.
[41.220. 1. There shall be a military
council consisting of the adjutant general as
president of the council, general officers, the
commanding officers of all brigades, wings, or
groups, and any other officer or officers the
adjutant general may deem desirable or
necessary, and an officer appointed by the
adjutant general from his office to act as
recorder without vote. The senior United States
Army and United States Air Force advisors on
duty with the organized state militia, the
comptroller of the state military forces and the
United States Property and Fiscal Officer shall
be ex officio members without vote. The
adjutant general shall appoint the members of
the military council on general orders
annually. These orders will be amended as
necessary. Members of the military council
shall receive actual and necessary expenses for
attending meetings thereof.
2. It shall be the duty of this council to
act in an advisory capacity to the commander in
chief on all matters placed before it by the
governor, the adjutant general or any member of
the council and to submit recommendations
thereon to the governor, which shall become
effective only upon his approval. The military
council shall determine and authorize the number
of regular and temporary employees necessary to
the administration and supply of the military
forces and fix the pay and allowances of the
employees within the limitations of
appropriations. It shall be the further duty of
the council to make recommendations on the needs
of the militia for legislative appropriations,
and no request for appropriations of public
money for the support of the militia, other than
a request by the governor or by a member of the
general assembly, shall be made without the
recommendation of the council being noted
thereon for the information of the governor and

SCS SB 1003 29
the legislature. All appropriations made for
military purposes shall be apportioned and
expended by the council. Vouchers and accounts
covering the expenditure of funds and
appropriations for the support of the militia
shall be approved and paid only when fully
itemized, certified and approved by the
president of the council.
3. The council shall meet quarterly at the
City of Jefferson at such time as the president
shall designate. Special meetings may be called
by the governor or the president of the council
at any time or place designated. A majority of
the members of the council on duty within the
state shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of its business. The council shall
keep full and detailed records of its
proceedings. The president of the council in an
unusual emergency is authorized to poll the
members of the military council and require them
to cast their vote through whatever means of
communications are available to them and the
action taken in that manner shall have the same
force and effect as a quarterly or special
meeting when the poll will expedite
recommendations on and furnish advice in the
conduct of the affairs of the militia of this
state to a better state of preparedness.]
✓